Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-260
Bonds; secured by trust indenture; contents; expenses; how treated.

The bonds may be secured by a trust indenture, which trust indenture may be in the form of a bond resolution or similar contract, by and between the authority and a corporate trustee which may be any financial institution having the power of a trust company or any trust company within or outside the state. Such trust indenture may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the exercise of its powers and the custody, safekeeping, and application of all money. The authority may provide by the trust indenture for the payment of the proceeds of the bonds and the revenue to the trustee under the trust indenture or other depository and for the method of disbursement of such proceeds, with such safeguards and restrictions as the authority may determine. All expenses incurred in carrying out the trust indenture may be treated as a part of the operating expenses of the authority. If the bonds are secured by a trust indenture, the bondholders shall have no authority to appoint a separate trustee to represent them.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 60;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 59.